Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF846.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1593HV (1) 91 sc/ns H.F. 846 Section 1. AUTHORIZATION ââ DISPOSITION OF REAL PROPERTY 1 ON CAPITOL COMPLEX. In accordance with section 8A.321, 2 subsection 8, paragraph âaâ, the director of the department 3 of administrative services is hereby authorized to dispose of 4 the Henry A. Wallace state office building, located at 502 5 East Ninth street, Des Moines, Iowa, and the capitol complex 6 parking structure located at 628 East Grand avenue, Des Moines, 7 Iowa, and all other real property associated with the building 8 and structure, upon terms, conditions, and consideration as 9 determined by the director. 10 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 11 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 12